Washington statutes.
RCW 15.100.030

Washington forest products commission—Created—Membership—Quorum—Terms.

(1)(a) There is created a commodity commission to be known and designated as the Washington forest products commission. The commission is composed of nine voting members. The commission may, in its sole discretion, add or remove nonvoting ex officio members to the commission. Of the members, six shall be from western Washington, and three shall be from eastern Washington. After the initial election of commission members, however, if a position cannot be filled by a member from eastern Washington within sixty days from the date on which nominations may first be received because of a lack of candidates, the position may be filled by a member from western Washington. Under no circumstances will there be less than two board members from eastern Washington. If a position was filled by a member from western Washington because of a lack of candidates from eastern Washington, and districts are not used for the nomination and election of members, then a person from eastern Washington must fill the next available vacancy or open position at the next election to bring the number of representatives from eastern Washington up to three members. All members shall be elected by the entire group of producers unless the commission creates districts for the members as authorized in RCW 15.100.050. If districts are used for the nomination and election of commission members, and it does not appear that one of the positions from eastern Washington will be filled because of a lack of candidates, then a commission member who resides in western Washington must be elected by the entire group of producers as an at large member. The position of the western Washington member who is elected as an at large member shall be filled by a member from eastern Washington at the expiration of the term of the at large member. If districts are not used for the nomination and election of members, the commission shall strive to achieve representation on the commission from the different geographic regions of the state.

(b) Of the six members from western Washington, three members must have annual harvests of more than seventy-five million board feet, and three members must have annual harvests between two million board feet and seventy-five million board feet.

(c) Of the two members from eastern Washington, one member must have an annual harvest greater than forty million board feet, and one member must have an annual harvest between two million board feet and forty million board feet. If there is a third member from eastern Washington, the only harvest requirement is that the member have an annual harvest of at least two million board feet.

(2) The members must be citizens and residents of this state, and over the age of twenty-one years. Each member must currently, and for the five years last preceding his or her election, be actually engaged in producing forest products within the state of Washington, either individually or as an officer of a corporation, firm, partnership, trust, association, or business organization at the level of production required to qualify as a producer. Each member must also derive a substantial amount of his or her income from the production of forest products. The qualifications set forth in this section apply throughout each member's term of office.

(3) No more than one member of the commission may be employed by, or connected in a proprietary capacity with, the same corporation, firm, partnership, trust, association, or business organization.

(4) Five voting members of the commission constitute a quorum for the transaction of all business and the carrying out of the duties of the commission.

(5) The regular term of office of the members is four years from November 1st following their election and until their successors are elected and qualified. However, the first terms of the members elected in the initial November 1st election is as follows: Positions one, four, and seven terminate on November 1st, two years after the initial election is held; positions two, five, and eight terminate on November 1st, three years after the initial election is held; and positions three, six, and nine terminate on November 1st, four years after the initial election is held.

[ 2002 c 251 s 2; 2001 c 314 s 3.]